District of Columbia statutes.
8-1424

Permits.

(a)

The District Department of Transportation may issue permits authorizing the transportation of materials listed in § 8-1423 upon a demonstration that there is no practical alternative route. A permit may require adoption of safety measures, including time-of-day restrictions.

(b)

The District Department of Transportation may collect fees for the permits in accordance with the rules issued under § 8-1426.

(c)

Permit fees collected pursuant to this section shall not exceed the cost of implementing and enforcing this subchapter.

History

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 5, 53 DCR 1047

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 5 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).